Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2340.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
ARTICLE 1: RELATING TO AUTHORIZING THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND TO
PROVIDE FINANCING SUPPORT TO ASSIST THE SALE OF ROGER WILLIAMS
MEDICAL CENTER AND OUR LADY OF FATIMA HOSPITAL TO CHARTERCARE
HEALTH OF RHODE ISLAND, INC.

ARTICLE 1
RELATING TO AUTHORIZING THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND TO PROVIDE
FINANCING SUPPORT TO ASSIST THE SALE OF ROGER WILLIAMS MEDICAL
CENTER AND OUR LADY OF FATIMA HOSPITAL TO CHARTERCARE HEALTH
OF RHODE ISLAND, INC.
SECTION 1. CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc. Debt Service Reserve Fund.
WHEREAS, The General Assembly has historically adopted laws and provided various
levels of support for the benefit of hospitals and healthcare facilities in the state for the health,
safety and welfare of the Rhode Island people; and
WHEREAS, Certain community hospitals act as the sole source of immediate access to
hospital care for residents of the areas they serve and are essential to the maintenance of public
health and safety; and
WHEREAS, The diversity of services provided by these essential community hospitals are
necessary for the overall health and safety of the community, but the costs of such services result
in financial distress for the hospitals that must serve large uninsured or governmentally insured
populations;
WHEREAS, Because of the important medical services provided by such hospitals,
restoring and ensuring the continued financial viability of these essential community hospitals is
necessary for the public health and safety; and
WHEREAS, Roger Williams Medical Center located in Providence, Rhode Island and Our
Lady of Fatima Hospital, located in North Providence, Rhode Island (the “Hospitals”) are distressed
essential community hospitals, currently under the supervision of the United States Bankruptcy
Court for the Northern District of Texas Dallas Division Case No 25-80002 (SGJ) and are currently
in the process of being sold to CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc. pursuant to an order of
the Bankruptcy Court and state approvals pursuant to the Hospital Conversions Act Rhode Island
General Laws § 23-17.14-1 et seq. and the Licensing of Healthcare Facilities Act Rhode Island
General Laws § 23-17-1 et seq.; and
WHEREAS, In fiscal year 2024, Roger Williams Medical Center provided care for nearly
31,500 emergency room patients, 55,000 inpatient cases and 84,000 outpatient visits,
demonstrating that the financial viability of Roger Williams Medical Center is vital to the public
health and safety of the community it serves; and
WHEREAS, In fiscal year 2024, Our Lady of Fatima Hospital provided care for nearly
25,500 emergency room patients, 4,857 inpatient cases and 124,000 outpatient visits,
demonstrating that the financial viability of Our Lady of Fatima Hospital is vital to the public health
LC004729/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

and safety of the community it serves; and
WHEREAS, Ensuring the financial viability of the Hospitals is expected to preserve two
thousand seven hundred (2,700) jobs and benefit the State of Rhode Island; and
WHEREAS, To preserve the viability of the Hospitals, it is necessary to provide financing
support to assist the sale of the Hospitals to CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc.; and
WHEREAS, CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc., itself or acting through its
affiliate or a special purpose entity created for such purpose, as borrower, intends to finance the
acquisition of the Hospitals and all or a portion of the related costs through the issuance of limited
obligations of the Rhode Island Health and Educational Building Corporation (the “Corporation”)
under its hospital revenue bond program; and
WHEREAS, Due to market conditions and to enhance the creditworthiness of the
borrower, it is critical to the sale of the bonds that the state provide no greater than eighteen million
dollars ($18,000,000) to fund a debt service reserve fund as credit support for the bonds; and
WHEREAS, The state from time to time may fund the debt service reserve fund from
available monies as set forth in Section 3 herein.
NOW THEREFORE, It is enacted and resolved by the General Assembly as follows:
RESOLVED, That this General Assembly hereby approves the creation of a debt service
reserve fund for the bonds in a principal amount funded by the state not to exceed $18,000,000 in
accordance with Section 3 hereof; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the state shall have no obligation to replenish the debt service reserve
fund, however, nothing contained herein shall prohibit the state by act of the General Assembly
from doing so in the event the debt service reserve fund is drawn upon; and be it further
RESOLVED, That any funds remaining in the debt service reserve fund upon payment in
full of the bonds shall revert to the supplemental state budget reserve account established pursuant
to Rhode Island General Laws § 35-3-20.2; and be it further
RESOLVED, That bonds issued by the Corporation will be special obligations of the
Corporation payable from funds received by the Corporation under the bond documents and other
revenues received by the Corporation, in any combination or priority as may be designated in the
proceedings of the Corporation authorizing the issuance of such debt; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the bonds will not constitute indebtedness of the state or any of its
subdivisions or a debt for which the full faith and credit of the state or any of its subdivisions is
pledged; and be it further
RESOLVED, That the state’s authority to incur the obligations set forth herein is
contingent upon the sale and issuance of the bonds to provide funds for the purchase of the
LC004729/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

Hospitals and all or a portion of the costs associated therewith. The authority hereunder shall
become effective upon the sale of the bonds and shall remain in effect as long the bonds remain
outstanding.
RESOLVED, That this joint resolution shall take effect upon passage.
SECTION 2. Section 35-3-20.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 35-3 entitled "State
Budget" is hereby amended to read as follows:
35-3-20.2. Supplemental state budget reserve account.
(a) There is hereby created within the general fund a supplemental state budget reserve
account, which shall be administered by the state controller and which shall be used solely for the
purpose of providing such sums as may be appropriated to fund any unanticipated general revenue
deficit caused by a general revenue shortfall.
(b) At any time after the third quarter of a fiscal year that it is indicated that total resources
which are defined to be the aggregate of estimated general revenue, general revenue receivables,
and available free surplus in the general fund will be less than the estimates upon which current
appropriations were based, the general assembly may make appropriations from the supplemental
state budget reserve account for the difference between the estimated total resources and the
original estimates upon which enacted appropriations were based, but only in the amount of the
difference based upon the revenues projected at the latest state revenue estimating conference
pursuant to chapter 16 of this title as reported by the chairperson of that conference.
(c) Whenever a transfer has been made pursuant to subsection (b), that transfer shall be
considered as estimated general revenues for the purposes of determining the amount to be
transferred to the Rhode Island capital plan fund for the purposes of § 35-3-20.1(b).
(d) The supplemental state budget reserve account shall consist of: (1) Such sums as the
state may from time to time directly transfer to the account as authorized in law; and (2) Any
amounts transferred pursuant to § 35-6-1(e).
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other law to the contrary, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the state controller shall transfer the sum of eighteen million
dollars ($18,000,000) from the supplemental state budget reserve account to general revenue.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of Article 1 of Chapter 278 of the Public Laws of 2025 is hereby
amended as follows:
Increase general revenue by $18,000,000 by adding a new line item within the general
program of the department of administration by inserting the following text after the line “Library
Construction Aid 2,115,628”:
Hospital Financing Support Debt Service Reserve $18,000,000
LC004729/SUB A - Page 4 of 5

Provided that, in order to provide credit enhancement to the proposed Hospital Financing
Revenue Bonds (CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc. Issue) to be issued by the Rhode Island
Health and Educational Building Corporation, $18,000,000 be allocated to the Rhode Island Health
and Educational Building Corporation to be used to fund a debt service reserve fund for the bonds.
Increase the department of administration grand total as follows:
Grand Total - Administration 430,628,941 448,628,941
Increase statewide totals general revenues as follows:
Statewide Totals
General Revenues 5,809,363,121 5,827,363,121
Increase statewide grand total as follows:
Statewide Grand Total 14,336,378,593 14,354,378,593
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided herein, this act shall take effect upon the sale
of the proposed Hospital Financing Revenue Bonds (CharterCARE Health of Rhode Island, Inc.
Issue) to be issued by the Rhode Island Health and Educational Building Corporation, and further
provided that if the bond issue does not close by May 8, 2026 this act shall not take effect.
========
LC004729/SUB A
========
LC004729/SUB A - Page 5 of 5